District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1747

Qualifications for licensure of property managers.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 11, 30 DCR 390
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 45, 35 DCR 147
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(k), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1930.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.